Missouri, session 2026, SB1565.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.765, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 537.765,
to read as follows:
537.765. 1. Contributory fault, as a complete bar to
plaintiff's recovery in a products liability claim, is
abolished. The doctrine of pure comparative fault shall
apply to products liability claims as provided in this
section.
2. Defendant may plead and prove the fault of the
plaintiff or any other person or entity as an affirmative
defense in any product liability claim, including all strict
liability claims. Any fault chargeable to the plaintiff or
any other person or entity shall diminish proportionately
the amount awarded as compensatory damages but shall not bar
recovery.
3. For purposes of this section, the term "fault" [is
limited to:
(1) The failure to use the product as reasonably
anticipated by the manufacturer;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1565 2
(2) Use of the product for a purpose not intended by
the manufacturer;
(3) Use of the product with knowledge of a danger
involved in such use with reasonable appreciation of the
consequences and the voluntary and unreasonable exposure to
said danger;
(4) Unreasonable failure to appreciate the danger
involved in use of the product or the consequences thereof
and the unreasonable exposure to said danger;
(5) The failure to undertake the precautions a
reasonably careful user of the product would take to protect
himself against dangers which he would reasonably appreciate
under the same or similar circumstances; or
(6) The failure to mitigate damages] means any
actionable breach of legal duty or act or omission
proximately causing or contributing to cause in any way the
accident or harm for which recovery of damages is sought,
including negligence in all of its degrees, comparative
negligence, assumption of risk, strict liability, breach of
express or implied warranty of a product, products
liability, and misuse, modification, or abuse of a product.
4. In a product liability claim, the liability of each
defendant for damages is several only and is not joint.
Each defendant is liable only for the amount of damages
allocated to that defendant in direct proportion to that
defendant's percentage of fault.
5. In assessing the percentages of fault, the trier of
fact shall consider the fault of all persons or entities who
contributed to the accident or harm, regardless of whether
the person or entity was, or could have been, named as a
party to the suit. The relative degree of fault of the
plaintiff, and the relative degrees of fault of all

SB 1565 3
defendants and nonparties, shall be determined and
apportioned as a whole at one time by the trier of fact.
✓